District of Columbia statutes.
29-408.02

Amendment before issuance of memberships.

If a membership corporation has not yet issued memberships, its board of directors, or its incorporators if it has no board of directors, may adopt one or more amendments to the articles of incorporation.

July 2, 2011, D.C. Law 18-378, § 2, 58 DCR 1720